Utah statutes.
78B-3-304.   Actions on written contracts.
An action on a contract signed in this state to perform an obligation may be
commenced and tried in the following venues:
(1)  If the action is to enforce an interest in real property securing a
consumer's obligation, the action may be brought only in the county where the
real property is located or where the defendant resides.
(2)  An action to enforce an interest other than under Subsection (1) may be
brought in the county where the obligation is to be performed, the contract
was signed, or in which the defendant resides.
